incubator/apertium-pes/dev/apertium-tg-fa.fa.dix
    <pardef n="V__چشید/ن__vblex">

                              <e>       <p><l>یم</l><r><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

                              <e>       <p><l>م</l><r><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

                              <e>       <p><l>ید</l><r><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

                              <e>       <p><l>ی</l><r><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

                              <e>       <p><l>ند</l><r><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

                              <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>


    <pardef n="V__/بچش[چشیدن]__vblex">

                              <e>       <p><l>ید</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

                              <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>


    <pardef n="V__چش/[چشیدن]__vblex">

                              <e>       <p><l>یم</l><r><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

                              <e>       <p><l>م</l><r><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

                              <e>       <p><l>ید</l><r><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

                              <e>       <p><l>ی</l><r><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

                              <e>       <p><l>ند</l><r><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

                              <e>       <p><l>د</l><r><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>

    

    <pardef n="aV__/استن__vbser">
  
      
                              <e>       <p><l>ایم</l><r>بودن<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

                              <e>       <p><l>ام</l><r>بودن<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

                              <e>       <p><l>اید</l><r>بودن<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

                              <e>       <p><l>ای</l><r>بودن<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

                              <e>       <p><l>اند</l><r>بودن<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

                              <e>       <p><l>است</l><r>بودن<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>


    <pardef n="/VERBS">

                              <e><par n="P__prefixes"/><p><l/><r>ن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="V__چشید/ن__vblex"/></e>

                              <e><par n="P__prefixes"/><p><l>ه</l><r>ن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><j/></r></p><par n="zwnj_or_space"/><par n="aV__/استن__vbser"/></e>

      
      
                              <e><par n="P__imp__prefixes"/><p><l>ان</l><r>ن<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

                              <e><par n="P__imp__prefixes"/><p><l/><r>ن<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p><par n="V__/بچش[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>

      
      
                              <e><par n="P__njprefixes"/><p><l/><r>ن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/></r></p><par n="V__چش/[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>

                              <e><par n="P__jprefixes"/><p><l/><r>ن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="V__چش/[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>

    </pardef>


    

    <pardef n="/VERBS_vowel">

                              <e><i/><p><l/><r>ن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="V__چشید/ن__vblex"/></e>

                              <e><par n="P__jnjprefixes"/><i/><p><l/><r>ن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="V__چشید/ن__vblex"/></e>

                              <e><par n="P__jjprefixes"/><p><l/><r>ن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="V__چشید/ن__vblex"/></e>

                              <e><i/><p><l>ه</l><r>ن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="zwnj_or_space"/><par n="aV__/استن__vbser"/></e>

                              <e><par n="P__jnjprefixes"/><i/><p><l>ه</l><r>ن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="zwnj_or_space"/><par n="aV__/استن__vbser"/></e>

                              <e><par n="P__jjprefixes"/><p><l>ه</l><r>ن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="zwnj_or_space"/><par n="aV__/استن__vbser"/></e>

      
      
                              <e><i/><p><l/><r>ن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

                              <e><par n="Pjj__imp__prefixes"/><p><l/><r>ن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

                              <e><i/><p><l/><r>ن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/></r></p><par n="V__/بچش[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>

                              <e><par n="Pjj__imp__prefixes"/><p><l/><r>ن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/></r></p><par n="V__/بچش[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>

      
      
                              <e><i/><p><l/><r>ن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="V__چش/[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>

                              <e><par n="P__ن"/><par n="P__jnjprefixes"/><i/><p><l/><r>ن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/></r></p><par n="V__چش/[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>

                              <e><par n="P__jjprefixes"/><p><l/><r>ن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="V__چش/[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>

    </pardef>


  
<pardef n="/VERBS_vowel__ندوختن">
                        <e><i>ا</i><p><l>ندوختن</l><r>ندوختنن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="V__چشید/ن__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__jnjprefixes"/><i>ا</i><p><l>ندوختن</l><r>ندوختنن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="V__چشید/ن__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__jjprefixes"/><p><l>یاندوختن</l><r>اندوختنن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="V__چشید/ن__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><i>ا</i><p><l>ندوختنه</l><r>ندوختنن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="zwnj_or_space"/><par n="aV__/استن__vbser"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__jnjprefixes"/><i>ا</i><p><l>ندوختنه</l><r>ندوختنن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="zwnj_or_space"/><par n="aV__/استن__vbser"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__jjprefixes"/><p><l>یاندوختنه</l><r>اندوختنن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="zwnj_or_space"/><par n="aV__/استن__vbser"/></e>
                        <e><i>ا</i><p><l>ندوز</l><r>ندوختنن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
                        <e><par n="Pjj__imp__prefixes"/><p><l>یاندوز</l><r>اندوختنن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
                        <e><i>ا</i><p><l>ندوز</l><r>ندوختنن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/></r></p><par n="V__/بچش[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="Pjj__imp__prefixes"/><p><l>یاندوز</l><r>اندوختنن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/></r></p><par n="V__/بچش[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><i>ا</i><p><l>ندوز</l><r>ندوختنن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="V__چش/[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__ن"/><par n="P__jnjprefixes"/><i>ا</i><p><l>ندوز</l><r>ندوختنن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/></r></p><par n="V__چش/[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__jjprefixes"/><p><l>یاندوز</l><r>اندوختنن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="V__چش/[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>

</pardef>

                            <e lm="اندوختن"><i/><par n="/VERBS_vowel__ندوختن"/></e>
                            <e lm=""><i/><par n="aV__/استن__vbser"/></e>
